Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 115 of Title 76, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Dirtbike” means a motorcycle designed primarily for off-


road use;


2. “Inherent risk of dirtbike use” means the dangers or


conditions that are an integral part of dirtbike use on roads,


paths, or other surfaces including, but not limited to:





Req. No. 3207 Page 1


a. injury or death caused by a change or variation in the


surface that may cause a participant to lose control,


lose his or her balance, or crash the dirtbike,


b. injury or death caused by a collision with a natural


or man-made object,


c. operator error, including equipment failure due to


operator error, and


d. aggravation of an injury, illness, or condition


because the injury, illness, or condition occurred in


a remote location where medical facilities are not


available;


3. “Motorcycle” means a motor vehicle having a seat or saddle


for use of the rider and designed to travel on no more than three


wheels in contact with the ground;


4. “Owner of private property” means a person, group, club,


partnership, corporation, business entity, whether or not operating


for profit, employee, or organized agent, that sponsors, organizes,


rents, or provides to a participant the use of private property for


dirtbike use; and


5. “Participant” means a person who rents, leases, or uses a


dirtbike on private property whether or not a fee is paid.


B. A participant assumes the inherent risk of dirtbike use by


engaging in dirtbike use on private property. A participant or his


or her representative shall not have a claim against, maintain an

Req. No. 3207 Page 2


action against, or recover from an owner of private property for


loss, damage, injury to, or the death of the participant resulting


from the inherent risk of dirtbike use. An owner of private


property shall not be liable for loss, damage, injury to, or the


death of a participant resulting from the inherent risk of dirtbike


use.


C. This section shall not:


1. Apply to a relationship between an employer and employee


pursuant to the Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act; or


2. Prevent or limit the liability of an owner of private


property that:


a. intentionally injures a participant,


b. commits an act or omission of gross negligence


concerning the safety of a participant that


proximately causes loss, damage, injury to, or the


death of the participant,


c. provides an unsafe dirtbike to a participant and


reasonably knew or should have known that the dirtbike


was unsafe to the extent that it could cause injury,


d. fails to use the degree of care that a reasonably


prudent person would use under the same or similar


circumstances, or


e. commits other acts, errors, or omissions that


constitute willful or wanton misconduct, gross

Req. No. 3207 Page 3


negligence, or criminal conduct that proximately


causes loss, damage, injury to, or the death of the


participant.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3207 BLB 1/13/2026 1:05:46 PM





































Req. No. 3207 Page 4